New Jersey, session 221, A2569.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  For the purposes of this section: "Emergency equipment" means firefighting, ambulance, and rescue equipment used for firefighting or emergency purposes, including communications and protective equipment. "Emergency vehicle" means a truck, ambulance, or other rescue vehicle used for firefighting and emergency purposes. False alarm means an alarm signal or other communication which elicits a response by a volunteer emergency service organization in which a situation requiring an emergency response does not in fact exist.  A false alarm shall not include an alarm signal or communication caused by violent conditions of nature or other extraordinary circumstances not reasonably subject to control by the individual or facility that signals or communicates. Volunteer emergency service organization" means any non-profit corporation, association, or organization located in this State which is regularly engaged in providing emergency medical care, rescue services, the transport of patients, or fire protection services, including part-paid fire departments and fire districts. "Volunteer emergency responder" means an active member in good standing of a volunteer fire company, a volunteer member of a duly incorporated first aid, rescue, or ambulance squad, or a member of any county or municipal volunteer Office of Emergency Management, provided the member's official duties include responding to a fire or emergency call. b.    In addition to any monies collected, including monies collected pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1999, c.195 (C.2C:33-3.2), a volunteer emergency service organization shall be reimbursed by the Department of Health for expenses associated with the use of or damage to emergency equipment and emergency vehicles used in response to a false alarm at a State psychiatric hospital or a State developmental center listed in R.S.30:1-7.  Any reimbursement provided pursuant to this section shall not affect the volunteer status of a volunteer emergency responder. 2.    a.  There shall be annually appropriated to the Department of Health from the General Fund such funds as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of section 1 of P.L. c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The Commissioner of the Department of Health shall, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 C.52:14B-1 et seq.), promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    a.  For the purposes of this section: "Emergency equipment" means firefighting, ambulance, and rescue equipment used for firefighting or emergency purposes, including communications and protective equipment. "Emergency vehicle" means a truck, ambulance, or other rescue vehicle used for firefighting and emergency purposes. False alarm means an alarm signal or other communication which elicits a response by a volunteer emergency service organization in which a situation requiring an emergency response does not in fact exist.  A false alarm does not include an alarm signal or communication caused by violent conditions of nature or other extraordinary circumstances not reasonably subject to control by the individual or facility that signals or communication. Volunteer emergency service organization" means any non-profit corporation, association, or organization located in this State which is regularly engaged in providing emergency medical care, rescue services, the transport of patients, or fire protection services, including part-paid fire departments and fire districts. "Volunteer emergency responder" means an active member in good standing of a volunteer fire company, a volunteer member of a duly incorporated first aid, rescue or ambulance squad, or a member of any county or municipal volunteer Office of Emergency Management, provided the member's official duties include responding to a fire or emergency call. b.    In addition to any monies collected, including monies collected pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1999, c.195 (C.2C:33-3.2), a volunteer emergency service organization shall be reimbursed by the Department of Corrections for expenses associated with the use of or damage to emergency equipment and emergency vehicles used in response to a false alarm at a State correctional facility.  Any reimbursement provided pursuant to this section shall not affect the volunteer status of a volunteer emergency responder. 4.    a.  There shall be annually appropriated to the Department of Corrections from the General Fund such funds as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of section 3 of P.L. c.     (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.